src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/Num-kueqhtt_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Numeral - kueʹhtt : # Numeral 'two/kaksi' - full paradigm
     kueʹhtt+Num+Sg+Nom: kueʹhtt
     kueʹhtt+Num+Sg+Gen: kueiʹt
     kueʹhtt+Num+Sg+Acc: kueʹhtt
     kueʹhtt+Num+Sg+Ill: kuâhtta
     kueʹhtt+Num+Sg+Loc: kueiʹtest
     kueʹhtt+Num+Sg+Com: kuõiʹtin
     kueʹhtt+Num+Ess: kueʹhtten
     kueʹhtt+Num+Par: kueʹhtted
     kueʹhtt+Num+Sg+Abe: [kueiʹtʼtaa, kueiʹtʼtää]
     kueʹhtt+Num+Pl+Nom: kueiʹt
     kueʹhtt+Num+Pl+Gen: kuõiʹti
     kueʹhtt+Num+Pl+Acc: kuõiʹtid
     kueʹhtt+Num+Pl+Ill: kuõiʹtid
     kueʹhtt+Num+Pl+Loc: kuõiʹtin
     kueʹhtt+Num+Pl+Com: kuõiʹtivuiʹm
     kueʹhtt+Num+Pl+Abe: [kuõiʹtitaa, kuõiʹtitää]
     kueʹhtt+Num+Use/SpellNoSugg+Der+Der/lazh+A+Sg+Nom: kuâitlaž
